District of Columbia statutes.
10-149

Potomac Park — Restriction on construction of lagoon, etc., or speedway.

No part of any money appropriated in any act shall be expended for or toward the construction of any lagoon, or other artificial body of water, or speedway, on any portion of said Park unless specifically authorized by Congress.

Aug. 1, 1914, 38 Stat. 634, ch. 223, § 1
1981 Ed., § 8-149.
1973 Ed., § 8-155.